District of Columbia statutes.
8-1059

Hearings.

Any person adversely affected by an action taken pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, or the rules and regulations issued under its authority, shall be entitled to a hearing before the Mayor upon filing with the Mayor, within 15 days of the date of the action, a written request for a hearing. The hearing shall be held in accordance with § 2-509.

Feb. 27, 1996, D.C. Law 11-94, § 10, 42 DCR 7172
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 8-1051.
1981 Ed., § 6-3459.